lt-LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 6714 Y 2
SFX 6714 emti emti/417 . 300
SFX 6714 emtis emtis/417 . 300

SFX 6725 Y 2
SFX 6725 emti emia/418 . 301
SFX 6725 emtis emiasi/418 . 301

SFX 6726 Y 2
SFX 6726 emti emia/419 . 301
SFX 6726 emtis emiasi/419 . 301

SFX 6727 Y 2
SFX 6727 emti emia/420 . 301
SFX 6727 emtis emiasi/420 . 301

SFX 6728 Y 2
SFX 6728 emti emia/421 . 301
SFX 6728 emtis emiasi/421 . 301

SFX 6729 Y 2
SFX 6729 emti emia/422 . 301
SFX 6729 emtis emiasi/422 . 301

SFX 6730 Y 2
SFX 6730 emti emia/423 . 301
SFX 6730 emtis emiasi/423 . 301

SFX 6731 Y 2
SFX 6731 emti emia/424 . 301
SFX 6731 emtis emiasi/424 . 301

SFX 6732 Y 2
SFX 6732 emti emia/425 . 301
SFX 6732 emtis emiasi/425 . 301

SFX 6733 Y 2
SFX 6733 emti emia/426 . 301
SFX 6733 emtis emiasi/426 . 301

SFX 6743 Y 1
SFX 6743 emti emie/427 . 301

SFX 6744 Y 1
SFX 6744 emtis emie/428 . 301

SFX 6745 Y 2
SFX 6745 emti ėmė/429 . 302
SFX 6745 emtis ėmėsi/429 . 302

SFX 6746 Y 2
SFX 6746 emti ėmė/430 . 302
SFX 6746 emtis ėmėsi/430 . 302

SFX 6747 Y 2
SFX 6747 emti ėmė/431 . 302
SFX 6747 emtis ėmėsi/431 . 302

SFX 6751 Y 2
SFX 6751 ūti ūti/408 . 300
SFX 6751 ūtis ūtis/408 . 300

SFX 6752 Y 2
SFX 6752 ūti ūti/438 . 300
SFX 6752 ūtis ūtis/438 . 300

SFX 6753 Y 2
SFX 6753 ūti ūti/410 . 300
SFX 6753 ūtis ūtis/410 . 300

SFX 6754 Y 2
SFX 6754 ūti ūti/411 . 300
SFX 6754 ūtis ūtis/411 . 300

SFX 6755 Y 2
SFX 6755 ūti ūti/412 . 300
SFX 6755 ūtis ūtis/412 . 300

SFX 6756 Y 2
SFX 6756 ūti ūti/413 . 300
SFX 6756 ūtis ūtis/413 . 300

SFX 6757 Y 2
SFX 6757 ūti ūti/414 . 300
SFX 6757 ūtis ūtis/414 . 300

SFX 6758 Y 2
SFX 6758 ūti ūti/415 . 300
SFX 6758 ūtis ūtis/415 . 300

SFX 6759 Y 2
SFX 6759 ūti ūti/416 . 300
SFX 6759 ūtis ūtis/416 . 300

SFX 6760 Y 2
SFX 6760 ūti ūti/417 . 300
SFX 6760 ūtis ūtis/417 . 300

SFX 6771 Y 2
SFX 6771 ūti ūva/418 . 301
SFX 6771 ūtis ūvasi/418 . 301

SFX 6772 Y 2
SFX 6772 ūti ūva/419 . 301
SFX 6772 ūtis ūvasi/419 . 301

SFX 6773 Y 2
SFX 6773 ūti ūva/420 . 301
SFX 6773 ūtis ūvasi/420 . 301

SFX 6774 Y 2
SFX 6774 ūti ūva/421 . 301
SFX 6774 ūtis ūvasi/421 . 301

SFX 6775 Y 2
SFX 6775 ūti ūva/422 . 301
SFX 6775 ūtis ūvasi/422 . 301

SFX 6776 Y 2
SFX 6776 ūti ūva/423 . 301
SFX 6776 ūtis ūvasi/423 . 301

SFX 6777 Y 2
SFX 6777 ūti ūva/424 . 301
SFX 6777 ūtis ūvasi/424 . 301

SFX 6778 Y 2
SFX 6778 ūti ūva/425 . 301
SFX 6778 ūtis ūvasi/425 . 301

SFX 6779 Y 2
SFX 6779 ūti ūva/426 . 301
SFX 6779 ūtis ūvasi/426 . 301

SFX 6789 Y 1
SFX 6789 ūti ūvie/427 . 301

SFX 6790 Y 1
SFX 6790 ūtis ūvie/428 . 301

SFX 6791 Y 2
SFX 6791 ūti uvo/429 . 302
SFX 6791 ūtis uvosi/429 . 302

SFX 6792 Y 2
SFX 6792 ūti uvo/430 . 302
SFX 6792 ūtis uvosi/430 . 302

SFX 6793 Y 2
SFX 6793 ūti uvo/431 . 302
SFX 6793 ūtis uvosi/431 . 302

SFX 6797 Y 2
SFX 6797 sti sti/408 . 300
SFX 6797 stis stis/408 . 300

SFX 6798 Y 2
SFX 6798 sti sti/409 . 300
SFX 6798 stis stis/409 . 300

SFX 6799 Y 2
SFX 6799 sti sti/410 . 300
SFX 6799 stis stis/410 . 300

SFX 6800 Y 2
SFX 6800 sti sti/411 . 300
SFX 6800 stis stis/411 . 300

SFX 6801 Y 2
SFX 6801 sti sti/412 . 300
SFX 6801 stis stis/412 . 300

SFX 6802 Y 2
SFX 6802 sti sti/413 . 300
SFX 6802 stis stis/413 . 300

SFX 6803 Y 2
SFX 6803 sti sti/414 . 300
SFX 6803 stis stis/414 . 300

SFX 6804 Y 2
SFX 6804 sti sti/415 . 300
SFX 6804 stis stis/415 . 300

SFX 6805 Y 2
SFX 6805 sti sti/416 . 300
SFX 6805 stis stis/416 . 300

SFX 6806 Y 2
SFX 6806 sti sti/417 . 300
SFX 6806 stis stis/417 . 300

SFX 6817 Y 2
SFX 6817 sti da/418 . 301
SFX 6817 stis dasi/418 . 301

SFX 6818 Y 2
SFX 6818 sti da/419 . 301
SFX 6818 stis dasi/419 . 301

SFX 6819 Y 2
SFX 6819 sti da/420 . 301
SFX 6819 stis dasi/420 . 301

SFX 6820 Y 2
SFX 6820 sti da/421 . 301
SFX 6820 stis dasi/421 . 301

SFX 6821 Y 2
SFX 6821 sti da/422 . 301
SFX 6821 stis dasi/422 . 301

SFX 6822 Y 2
SFX 6822 sti da/423 . 301
SFX 6822 stis dasi/423 . 301

SFX 6823 Y 2
SFX 6823 sti da/424 . 301
SFX 6823 stis dasi/424 . 301

SFX 6824 Y 2
SFX 6824 sti da/425 . 301
SFX 6824 stis dasi/425 . 301

SFX 6825 Y 2
SFX 6825 sti da/426 . 301
SFX 6825 stis dasi/426 . 301

SFX 6835 Y 1
SFX 6835 sti die/427 . 301

SFX 6836 Y 1
SFX 6836 stis die/428 . 301

SFX 6837 Y 2
SFX 6837 sti do/429 . 302
SFX 6837 stis dosi/429 . 302

SFX 6838 Y 2
SFX 6838 sti do/430 . 302
SFX 6838 stis dosi/430 . 302

SFX 6839 Y 2
SFX 6839 sti do/431 . 302
SFX 6839 stis dosi/431 . 302

SFX 6843 Y 2
SFX 6843 alti alti/408 . 300
SFX 6843 altis altis/408 . 300

SFX 6844 Y 2
SFX 6844 alti alti/409 . 300
SFX 6844 altis altis/409 . 300

SFX 6845 Y 2
SFX 6845 alti alti/410 . 300
SFX 6845 altis altis/410 . 300

SFX 6846 Y 2
SFX 6846 alti alti/411 . 300
SFX 6846 altis altis/411 . 300

SFX 6847 Y 2
SFX 6847 alti alti/412 . 300
SFX 6847 altis altis/412 . 300

SFX 6848 Y 2
SFX 6848 alti alti/413 . 300
SFX 6848 altis altis/413 . 300

SFX 6849 Y 2
SFX 6849 alti alti/414 . 300
SFX 6849 altis altis/414 . 300

SFX 6850 Y 2
SFX 6850 alti alti/415 . 300
SFX 6850 altis altis/415 . 300

SFX 6851 Y 2
SFX 6851 alti alti/416 . 300
SFX 6851 altis altis/416 . 300

SFX 6852 Y 2
SFX 6852 alti alti/417 . 300
SFX 6852 altis altis/417 . 300

SFX 6863 Y 2
SFX 6863 alti ąla/418 . 301
SFX 6863 altis ąlasi/418 . 301

SFX 6864 Y 2
SFX 6864 alti ąla/419 . 301
SFX 6864 altis ąlasi/419 . 301

SFX 6865 Y 2
SFX 6865 alti ąla/420 . 301
SFX 6865 altis ąlasi/420 . 301

SFX 6866 Y 2
SFX 6866 alti ąla/421 . 301
SFX 6866 altis ąlasi/421 . 301

SFX 6867 Y 2
SFX 6867 alti ąla/422 . 301
SFX 6867 altis ąlasi/422 . 301

SFX 6868 Y 2
SFX 6868 alti ąla/423 . 301
SFX 6868 altis ąlasi/423 . 301

SFX 6869 Y 2
SFX 6869 alti ąla/424 . 301
SFX 6869 altis ąlasi/424 . 301

SFX 6870 Y 2
SFX 6870 alti ąla/425 . 301
SFX 6870 altis ąlasi/425 . 301

SFX 6871 Y 2
SFX 6871 alti ąla/426 . 301
SFX 6871 altis ąlasi/426 . 301

SFX 6881 Y 1
SFX 6881 alti ąlie/427 . 301

SFX 6882 Y 1
SFX 6882 altis ąlie/428 . 301

SFX 6883 Y 2
SFX 6883 alti alo/429 . 302
SFX 6883 altis alosi/429 . 302

SFX 6884 Y 2
SFX 6884 alti alo/430 . 302
SFX 6884 altis alosi/430 . 302

SFX 6885 Y 2
SFX 6885 alti alo/431 . 302
SFX 6885 altis alosi/431 . 302

SFX 6889 Y 2
SFX 6889 irti irti/408 . 300
SFX 6889 irtis irtis/408 . 300

SFX 6890 Y 2
SFX 6890 irti irti/409 . 300
SFX 6890 irtis irtis/409 . 300

SFX 6891 Y 2
SFX 6891 irti irti/410 . 300
SFX 6891 irtis irtis/410 . 300

SFX 6892 Y 2
SFX 6892 irti irti/411 . 300
SFX 6892 irtis irtis/411 . 300

SFX 6893 Y 2
SFX 6893 irti irti/412 . 300
SFX 6893 irtis irtis/412 . 300

SFX 6894 Y 2
SFX 6894 irti irti/413 . 300
SFX 6894 irtis irtis/413 . 300

SFX 6895 Y 2
SFX 6895 irti irti/414 . 300
SFX 6895 irtis irtis/414 . 300

SFX 6896 Y 2
SFX 6896 irti irti/415 . 300
SFX 6896 irtis irtis/415 . 300

SFX 6897 Y 2
SFX 6897 irti irti/416 . 300
SFX 6897 irtis irtis/416 . 300

SFX 6898 Y 2
SFX 6898 irti irti/417 . 300
SFX 6898 irtis irtis/417 . 300

SFX 6909 Y 2
SFX 6909 irti yra/418 . 301
SFX 6909 irtis yrasi/418 . 301

SFX 6910 Y 2
SFX 6910 irti yra/419 . 301
SFX 6910 irtis yrasi/419 . 301

SFX 6911 Y 2
SFX 6911 irti yra/420 . 301
SFX 6911 irtis yrasi/420 . 301

SFX 6912 Y 2
SFX 6912 irti yra/421 . 301
SFX 6912 irtis yrasi/421 . 301

SFX 6913 Y 2
SFX 6913 irti yra/422 . 301
SFX 6913 irtis yrasi/422 . 301

SFX 6914 Y 2
SFX 6914 irti yra/423 . 301
SFX 6914 irtis yrasi/423 . 301

SFX 6915 Y 2
SFX 6915 irti yra/424 . 301
SFX 6915 irtis yrasi/424 . 301

SFX 6916 Y 2
SFX 6916 irti yra/425 . 301
SFX 6916 irtis yrasi/425 . 301

SFX 6917 Y 2
SFX 6917 irti yra/426 . 301
SFX 6917 irtis yrasi/426 . 301

SFX 6927 Y 1
SFX 6927 irti yrie/427 . 301

SFX 6928 Y 1
SFX 6928 irtis yrie/428 . 301

SFX 6929 Y 2
SFX 6929 irti iro/429 . 302
SFX 6929 irtis irosi/429 . 302

SFX 6930 Y 2
SFX 6930 irti iro/430 . 302
SFX 6930 irtis irosi/430 . 302

SFX 6931 Y 2
SFX 6931 irti iro/431 . 302
SFX 6931 irtis irosi/431 . 302

SFX 6935 Y 2
SFX 6935 isti isti/408 . 300
SFX 6935 istis istis/408 . 300

SFX 6936 Y 2
SFX 6936 isti isti/409 . 300
SFX 6936 istis istis/409 . 300

SFX 6937 Y 2
SFX 6937 isti isti/410 . 300
SFX 6937 istis istis/410 . 300

AF 6889,6890,6909,6929,9999 # 133
AF 6843,6844,6863,6883,9999 # 156
AF 6705,6706,6725,6745,9999 # 158
AF 6935,6936,6955,6975,9999 # 181
AF 6797,6798,6817,6837,9999 # 185
AF 6751,6752,6771,6791,9999 # 341
