lt-LT.dic
apžabalti/156	11
atsemti/158	11
atsisėsti/185	13
atskristi/181	11
balti/156	11
besisemti/158	13
birti/133	11
bristi/181	11
grūsti/185	11
išbirti/133	11
išgrūsti/185	11
išnirti/133	11
išskristi/181	11
ištremti/158	11
iššalti/156	11
neapsivemti/158	34
neapšalti/156	33
neatsiremti/158	34
neatsisėsti/185	34
neatskristi/181	33
nebalti/156	33
nebeatskristi/181	33
nebebalti/156	33
nebegrūsti/185	33
nebeišbristi/181	33
nebeišnirti/133	33
nebenulemti/158	33
nebenuskristi/181	33
nebepabirti/133	33
nebepaskristi/181	33
nebepasvirti/133	33
nebeperšalti/156	33
nebesemti/158	33
nebesigrūsti/185	34
nebesugrūsti/185	33
nebesušalti/156	33
nebesėsti/185	33
nebevemti/158	33
nebeįbristi/181	33
nebeįšalti/156	33
nebirti/133	33
nebristi/181	33
negrūsti/185	33
neišbalti/156	33
neišnirti/133	33
neišskristi/181	33
neištremti/158	33
nenugrūsti/185	33
nenusemti/158	33
nenuskristi/181	33
nenusvirti/133	33
nenušalti/156	33
nenuščiūti/341	33
nepanirti/133	33
nepasisemti/158	34
nepaskristi/181	33
nepasrūti/341	33
nepašalti/156	33
nepažirti/133	33
nepergrūsti/185	33
neperskristi/181	33
neprasigrūsti/185	34
neprisisemti/158	34
nepriskristi/181	33
neprisėsti/185	33
neprišalti/156	33
nesiremti/158	34
nesisėsti/185	34
nesrūti/341	33
nesubirti/133	33
nesusiremti/158	34
nesuskristi/181	33
nesvirti/133	33
nesėsti/185	33
neužšalti/156	33
nevemti/158	33
neįgrūsti/185	33
neįskristi/181	33
nešalti/156	33
nubirti/133	11
nusemti/158	11
nusrūti/341	11
nusvirti/133	11
nusėsti/185	11
nušalti/156	11
nuščiūti/341	11
pabirti/133	11
parskristi/181	11
pasiremti/158	13
pasrūti/341	11
pastirti/133	11
pašalti/156	11
pažirti/133	11
peršalti/156	11
pragrūsti/185	11
praskristi/181	11
pribirti/133	11
prisemti/158	11
prisėsti/185	11
remtis/158	13
salti/156	11
srūti/341	11
subirti/133	11
subliūti/341	11
susemti/158	11
susėsti/185	11
svirti/133	11
teatskristi/181	11
tebalti/156	11
tebesrūti/341	11
telemti/158	11
tenubristi/181	11
tesrūti/341	11
tesusėsti/185	11
teįšalti/156	11
užsemti/158	11
užšalti/156	11
įbristi/181	11
įgrūsti/185	11
įnirti/133	11
